New York, session 2025-2026, S78.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 212-d 2 to read as follows: 3 § 212-d. Notice of tuition liability policies. 1. All colleges, 4 universities, professional, proprietary and graduate schools shall 5 provide written notice to all students of the institution's tuition 6 liability policy. Such notice shall be provided in clear and conspicuous 7 language and include notice of policies related to exceptions of tuition 8 liability and process for requesting any such exception. 9 2. Notice shall be provided to the student in both hard copy and elec- 10 tronic form, and the student shall acknowledge understanding of the 11 policy as well as receipt of notice. All colleges, universities, profes- 12 sional, proprietary and graduate schools shall provide additional 13 notices to all students of the tuition liability policy and its 14 exceptions throughout the academic year. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00534-01-5